Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Distilled Spirits Tax

243.680.
Tax on manufacturing and importation of distilled spirits — Biennial reduction — Exemption of nonbeverage alcohol. [Repealed.]

243.685.
Exemption of alcohol and distilled spirits for industrial purposes. [Repealed.]

243.690.
Tax on blending, rectifying and mixing. [Repealed.]

243.700.
Suit to delay payment forbidden — Repayment of taxes. [Repealed.]

243.705.
No tax for privilege of manufacturing distilled spirits in amount equal to amount destroyed by accidental fire. [Repealed.]

243.706.
Permit for manufacture of distilled spirits to replace spirits lost by fire; conditions of issuance. [Repealed.]

243.707.
Legislative intent as to tax allowance for distilled spirits lost by fire. [Repealed.]